Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 14 Arkansas Time-Share Act
18-14-305. Instruments establishing time-share uses.

A project instrument or time-share instrument that establishes time-share uses containing accommodations located or offered in this state shall contain:

(1)

Identification by name of the time-share plan and street address where the time-share plan is situated;

(2)

Identification of the time periods, type of accommodations, the accommodations that are in the time-share plan and the length of time that the accommodations are committed to the time-share plan;

(3)

In case of a time-share plan, identification of which accommodations are in the time-share plan and the method for adding, deleting, or substituting other accommodations; and

(4)

Any other matters that the developer considers appropriate.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-105; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1312; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “establishing” for “creating” in the section heading; substituted “plan” for “project” or “program” and “accommodations” for “units” throughout the section; rewrote the introductory language; substituted “for adding, deleting, or substituting other accommodations” for “whereby any other units may be added, deleted, or substituted” in (3); and substituted “considers” for “deems” in (4).

18-14-306. Provisions for management and operation of time-share use plans.

The time-share instruments for a time-share use plan containing accommodations offered in this state shall prescribe reasonable arrangements for the management and operation of the time-share plan and for the maintenance, repair, and furnishing of accommodations including:

(1)

Standards and procedures for upkeep, repair, and interior furnishing of accommodations and for maid, cleaning, linen, and similar services to the accommodations during use periods;

(2)

Adoption of standards and rules of conduct governing the use and occupancy of accommodations by owners;

(3)

Payment of the costs and expenses of operating the time-share plan and owning and maintaining the accommodations;

(4)

Selection of a managing agent;

(5)

Preparation and dissemination to owners of an annual budget, operating statements, and other financial information concerning the time-share plan or time-share property;

(6)

Procedures for establishing the rights of owners to the use of accommodations by prearrangement or under a first-reserved, first-served priority system;

(7)

Organization of a management advisory board consisting of time-share use owners, including an enumeration of rights and responsibilities of the board;

(8)

Procedures for imposing and collecting assessments or use fees from time-share use owners as necessary to defray costs of management of the time-share plan and providing materials and services to the accommodations;

(9)

Comprehensive general liability insurance for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the use of accommodations by time-share use owners, their guests, and other users;

(10)

Methods for providing compensating use periods or monetary compensation to an owner if an accommodation cannot be made available for the period to which the owner is entitled by schedule or by a confirmed reservation; and

(11)(A)

Procedures for imposing a monetary penalty or suspension of an owner's rights and privileges in the time-share plan for failure of the owner to comply with the time-share instruments or the rules established by the developer concerning the use of the accommodations.

(B)

The owner shall be given notice and the opportunity to refute or explain the charges, in person or in writing, to the management advisory board before a decision to impose discipline is rendered.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-106; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1313; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plans” for “programs” in the section heading;
substituted “accommodations” for “units” and “plan” for “program” throughout the section; rewrote the introductory language; deleted “providing of” preceding “maid” in (1); in (5), deleted “and of” following “budget” and substituted “plan or time-share property” for “program”; redesignated (11) as (11)(A) and (B); in (11)(A), deleted “provisions of the” following “comply with the” and substituted “concerning” for “with respect to”; and deleted (12).

18-14-307. Partition of accommodations.

An action for partition of an accommodation shall not be maintained unless permitted by the time-share instrument.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-107; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1314; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “accommodations” for “units” in the section heading; substituted “an accommodation shall not” for “a unit may”; and “unless” for “except as”.

18-14-308. Records.

(a)

The association or managing agent shall maintain among its records a list of the names and post office addresses of the owners of time-share interests in the time-share plan.

(b)

The list shall:

(1)

Be updated every six (6) months; and

(2)

Not be published or provided to owners or a third person to use or sell the list for commercial purposes.

(c)(1)

If an owner of a time-share interest in the time-share plan provides a written request to the association to communicate with its membership, the association shall determine within thirty (30) days of the date of the request whether the communication advances legitimate association business and if so, provide a method to grant the request without disclosing the association membership list to the requesting owner.

(2)(A)

The association shall notify the requesting owner of the costs to make the communication before the communication is made to the owners.

(B)

The requesting owner shall pay the costs to the association before the association makes the communication.

(3)

An alternative method that accomplishes the original purpose of the request made under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is a reasonable alternative.

(4)(A)

If the association determines that a communication does not advance legitimate association business, the association shall notify the requesting owner in writing within thirty (30) days of the reasons for the rejection.

(B)

An owner that is denied a request for information under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section may appeal the denial to the court in whose jurisdiction the association lies.

(C)

If the court determines that the communication does advance legitimate association business, the court may order the association to pay the requesting owner's costs, including attorney's fees reasonably incurred to enforce the requesting owner's rights.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

18-14-309. Supervisory authority.

(a)

Notwithstanding the obligations imposed on other persons by this chapter, the developer shall supervise, manage, and control the aspects of the offering of a time-share plan, including the promotion, advertising, contracting, and closing.

(b)

A violation of this section during the offering is a violation by the developer and the person that committed the violation.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

18-14-310. Out-of-state time-share plan.

(a)

A single site time-share plan and component sites of a multisite time-share plan that are located outside the state are to be established and governed by the applicable laws of the state in which the time-share property or component site is located.

(b)

If there is a conflict between the affirmative standards stated in the laws of the state or jurisdiction that governs an out-of-state time-share plan and this subchapter, the law of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property is located controls.

(c)

If the association and the time-share instruments provide for the matters contained in §§18-14-302 —18-14-306, as applicable, the developer or association is considered to be in compliance with these sections and is not required to revise the time-share instruments to comply with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Protection of Purchasers

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-401. Penalties.

A developer or any other person subject to this chapter that offers or disposes of a time-share interest without complying with this chapter or that violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per occurrence or by imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-108; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1322; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-402. Civil remedies.

(a)(1)

If a developer or any other person subject to this chapter violates this chapter or a project instrument, a person or class of persons adversely affected by the violation has a claim for appropriate relief.

(2)

Punitive damages or attorney's fees, or both, may be awarded for willful violation of this chapter.

(b)

Section17-42-401 et seq. does not apply to any claims arising from or damages caused by a violation of this chapter, the Real Estate License Law, §17-42-101 et seq., or rules by a licensee while engaged in a time-share activity.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-108; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1322; Acts 1989, No. 45, § 2; 1991, No. 786, § 27; 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 45, § 3, provided that the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may promulgate such regulations as it deems necessary for the implementation of this act.

Acts 1991, No. 786, § 37, provided:

“The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 78th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment subdivided (a) as (a)(1) and (a)(2); in (a)(1), substituted “this chapter or a project instrument, a” for “any provision thereof or any provision of the project instruments, any” and deleted “or violations” following “violation”; and rewrote (b).

18-14-403. Statute of limitations.

(a)

A judicial proceeding in which the accuracy of the public offering statement or validity of a contract of purchase is in issue and a rescission of the contract or damages is sought shall be commenced not later than four (4) years after the date of the contract of purchase, notwithstanding that the purchaser's terms of payment may extend beyond the period of limitation.

(b)

If the enforcement of provisions in the contract of purchase requires the continued furnishing of services and the reciprocal payments to be made by the purchaser, the period of bringing a judicial proceeding will continue for a period of four (4) years for each breach, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than two (2) years.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-109; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1323; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated the paragraph as (a) and (b); substituted “shall be commenced not later than” for “must be commenced within” in (a); and substituted “If the enforcement of provisions in the contract of purchase requires” for “However, with respect to the enforcement of provisions in the contract of purchase which require” in (b).

18-14-404. Required contents of public offering statements for time-share interests.

(a)

A public offering statement shall be provided to each purchaser of a time-share interest and may be delivered by hard copy or electronically, including a CD, DVD, thumb drive, or other electronic media agreeable to the purchaser. The public offering statement shall fully and accurately disclose:

(1)

The name of the developer, its principal address, and the time-share plan offered in the statement;

(2)

A general description of the accommodations, including, without limitation, the developer's schedule of commencement and completion of all buildings, accommodations, and amenities or, if completed, that the buildings, accommodations, and amenities have been completed;

(3)

As to the accommodations offered by the developer in the time-share plan:

(A)

The types and number of accommodations by location, if applicable;

(B)

Identification of accommodations that are subject to time-share interests; and

(C)

The estimated number of accommodations that may become subject to time-share interests;

(4)

A brief description of the time-share plan;

(5)(A)

If applicable, the current budget and a projected budget for the time-share interests for one (1) year after the date of the first transfer to a purchaser.

(B)

The budget shall include, without limitation:

(i)

A statement of the amount included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement;

(ii)

The projected common expense liability, if any, by category or expenditures for the time-share interests;

(iii)

The total annual projected common expense liability for all time-share interests in the time-share plan; and

(iv)

A statement of any services not shown in the budget that the developer provides or expenses that it pays;

(6)

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

(7)

A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to any of the time-share interests;

(8)

A description of any financing offered by the developer;

(9)

A statement that within five (5) days after execution of a contract of purchase a purchaser may cancel any contract for purchase of time-share interests from the developer;

(10)

A statement of any pending suits material to the time-share interests of which the developer has actual knowledge;

(11)

Any restraints on alienation of any number or part of any of the time-share interests;

(12)

A description of the insurance coverage that is for the benefit of the owners of time-share interests;

(13)

Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by time-share interest owners for the use of any facilities related to any of the time-share property;

(14)

The extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of the promised improvements; and

(15)

The extent to which a time-share accommodation may become subject to a tax or other lien arising out of claims against other owners of the accommodation.

(b)(1)

If a purchaser is offered the opportunity to subscribe to any program that provides exchanges of time-shares among purchasers in either the same time-sharing plan or other time-sharing plans, or both, the developer shall deliver to the purchaser before the execution of a contract between the purchaser and the company offering the exchange program, written information concerning the exchange program, which information may be delivered by hard copy or electronically.

(2)

The purchaser shall certify in writing to the receipt of the information that includes:

(A)

The name and address of the exchange program;

(B)

The names of the officers and directors;

(C)

Whether the exchange program, or any of its officers or directors, has a legal or beneficial interest in any developer or managing agent for a time-share plan participating in the exchange program and, if so, the name and location of the time-share plan and the nature of the interest;

(D)

Unless otherwise stated, a statement that the purchaser's contract with the exchange program is a contract separate and distinct from the purchaser's contract with the developer;

(E)

Whether the purchaser's participation in the exchange program is dependent upon the continued affiliation of the time-share project with the exchange program;

(F)

Whether the purchaser's membership or participation, or both, in the exchange program is voluntary or mandatory;

(G)

A complete and accurate description of the terms and conditions of the purchaser's contractual relationship with the exchange program and the procedure by which changes may be made;

(H)

A complete and accurate description of the procedure to qualify for and carry out exchanges;

(I)

A complete and accurate description of the limitations, restrictions, or priorities used in the operation of the exchange program, including limitations on exchanges based on seasonality, accommodation size, or levels of occupancy that are expressed in bold-faced type and if limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied by the exchange program, a clear description of the way in which they are applied;

(J)

Whether exchanges are arranged on a space-available basis and whether any guarantees of fulfillment of specific requests for exchanges are made by the exchange program;

(K)

Whether and under what circumstances, a purchaser, in dealing with the exchange program, may lose the use and occupancy of his or her time-share in any exchange properly applied for without his or her being provided with substitute accommodations by the exchange program;

(L)

The fees or range of fees for participation by purchasers in the exchange program, a statement whether such fees may be altered by the exchange company, and the circumstances under which alterations may be made;

(M)

The name and address of the site of each accommodation or facility included in the time-share properties that are participating in the exchange program as of the last annual review or audit;

(N)

The number of time-share accommodations in each time-share property that are available for occupancy, under the last annual review or audit, and that qualify for participation in the exchange program, expressed in numerical groupings: 1-5, 6-10, 11-20, 21-50, and 51 and over;

(O)

The number of purchasers enrolled for each time-share plan participating in the exchange program, under the last annual review or audit, expressed in numerical groupings: 1-100, 101-249, 250-499, 500-999, and 1,000 and over, and a statement of the criteria used to determine those purchasers that are enrolled with the exchange program;

(P)

The disposition made by the exchange company of time-shares deposited with the exchange program by purchasers enrolled in the exchange program and not used by the exchange company in making changes;

(Q)

The information required in this subdivision (b)(2)(Q) shall be independently reviewed or audited by a certified public accountant or accounting firm according to the standards of the Financial Accounting Standards Board and annually reported:

(i)

The number of purchasers currently enrolled in the exchange program;

(ii)

The number of accommodations and facilities that have current written affiliation agreements with the exchange program;

(iii)

The percentage of confirmed exchanges that are the number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange program divided by the number of exchanges properly applied for, together with a complete and accurate statement of the criteria used to determine whether an exchange request was properly applied for;

(iv)

The number of time-share periods for which the exchange program has an outstanding obligation to provide an exchange to a purchaser who relinquished a time-share during the year in exchange for a time-share in any future year; and

(v)

The number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange program during the year; and

(R)(i)

A statement in boldface type to the effect that the percentage described in subdivision (b)(2)(Q)(iii) of this section is a summary of the exchange requests entered with the exchange program in the period reported.

(ii)

The percentage does not indicate a purchaser's probabilities of being confirmed to a specific choice or range of choices, since availability at individual locations may vary.

(c)

Each exchange company offering an exchange program to purchasers in this state shall include the statement in subdivision (b)(2)(R) of this section on all promotional brochures, pamphlets, advertisements, or other materials distributed by the exchange company that contains the percentage in subdivision (b)(2)(Q)(iii) of this section.

(d)(1)

A developer may satisfy the requirements of this section by delivery to purchasers of materials furnished to the developer by the exchange program if the exchange program has certified to the developer that the materials satisfy the requirements of this section.

(2)

A developer has no liability to a person if the materials furnished by the exchange program fail to comply with this section.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1315; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-405. Material changes.

(a)

The developer shall amend or supplement the public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by §18-14-404.

(b)

The developer shall use the written materials that are supplied to it by an exchange program for distribution to the time-share interest owners as the materials are received.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-106; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1320; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated the paragraph as (a) and (b); and, in (b), inserted “by an exchange program”, deleted “As to any exchange program” from the beginning, deleted “current” preceding “written”, and substituted “interest owners as the materials are” for “interval owners as it is”.

18-14-406. Other statutes not applicable.

(a)

A time-share plan in which a public offering statement is prepared under this chapter does not require registration under any of the following:

(1)

Arkansas Securities Act, §23-42-101 et seq.; or

(2)

Any other Arkansas statute that requires a public offering statement or substantially similar document for distribution to purchasers.

(b)(1)

A time-share plan that fails to restrict the price at which an owner may sell or exchange his or her time-share interest does not by that failure cause the time-share interest to become a security under the Arkansas Securities Act, §23-42-101 et seq.

(2)

An exchange agent offering a time-share interest for exchange is not considered to be offering a security under the Arkansas Securities Act, §23-42-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-105; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1319; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plan” for “program” throughout the section; deleted “the preparation of” preceding “a public offering statement” in (a)(2); redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “interest does not by that” for “interval shall not by virtue of such” and “interest” for “interval”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “interest” for “interval”, “is not considered” for “shall not be construed” and “the Arkansas Securities Act, §23-42-101 et seq.” for “such act”.

18-14-407. Escrow accounts — Other financial assurances.

(a)

Any deposit made with the purchase or reservation of a time-share interest from a developer shall be placed in a noninterest-bearing escrow account and held in this state, or other jurisdiction that is acceptable to the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, in a designated account by an independent bonded escrow company or in an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality until:

(1)

Delivered to the developer at the end of the time for rescission or a later time specified in a contract or sale;

(2)

Delivered to the developer because of the purchaser's default under a contract to purchase the time-share interest; or

(3)

Refunded to the purchaser.

(b)(1)

In lieu of any escrows required by this section, the commission has the discretion to accept other financial assurances, including a surety bond, or a cash deposit in an amount equal to the escrow requirements of this section.

(2)

Interest earned on a surety bond or other deposit while deposited with, or for the benefit of, the commission becomes the property of the commission and is deposited into the Real Estate Recovery Fund in §17-42-403.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-102; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1316; Acts 1989, No. 44, § 2; 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 44, § 4, provided that the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may promulgate such regulations as it deems necessary for the implementation of this act.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Other” for “or other” in the section heading; substituted “interest” for “interval” throughout the section; in (a), deleted “in connection” following “Any deposit made” and substituted “or other jurisdiction that is acceptable to the Arkansas Real Estate Commission in a designated account” for “in an account designated solely for the purpose”; substituted “end” for “expiration” in (a)(1); in (b)(1), substituted “commission has” for “agency shall have”, deleted “but not limited to” preceding “a surety bond”, and deleted “an irrevocable letter of credit” following “surety bond”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “a surety bond” for “any such bond”, “commission becomes” for “agency shall become”, “commission” for “agency”, substituted “is deposited into” for “shall be deposited in” and deleted “created” preceding “in §17-42-203”.

18-14-408. Guarantees for completion of time-share properties.

(a)(1)

If a developer contracts to sell a time-share interest and the construction, furnishings, and landscaping of the time-share property have not been substantially completed according to the representations made by the developer in the disclosures under this chapter, the developer shall pay into an escrow account established and held in this state, in an account designated solely for the purpose, by an independent bonded escrow company, or in an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality, a payment received by the developer from the purchaser towards the sale price until the time-share property is substantially complete.

(2)

The escrow agent may invest the escrow funds in securities for the United States, any agency thereof, or in savings or time deposits in institutions insured by an agency of the United States.

(3)

Funds are released from escrow as follows:

(A)

If a purchaser properly terminates the contract under its terms or this chapter, the funds shall be paid to the purchaser, together with any interest earned;

(B)

If the purchaser defaults in the performance of his or her obligations under the contract of purchase and sale, the funds shall be paid to the developer, together with any interest earned; or

(C)

If the funds of a purchaser have not been previously disbursed under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, they may be disbursed to the developer by the escrow agent upon substantial completion of the time-share property.

(4)(A)

The developer is not required to comply with subdivision (a)(1) of this section if the commission is satisfied that all of the following conditions are met:

(i)

The developer is an Arkansas corporation or a foreign corporation qualified to do business in Arkansas;

(ii)

The corporation has been in existence and operated in this state for at least three (3) years; and

(iii)

The corporation has net assets within this state of at least three (3) times the cost to complete the time-share property.

(B)

The commission may require other assurances as may reasonably be required either to assure completion of the time-share property or to reimburse the purchaser the funds paid to the developer, together with any interest earned.

(5)(A)

In lieu of the escrow required by subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the commission may accept other financial assurances, including a performance bond equal to the cost to finish the time-share property.

(B)

Interest earned on the performance bond under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section, deposit, or other instrument while deposited with or for the benefit of the commission shall become the separate property of the commission and be deposited into the Real Estate Recovery Fund under §17-42-403.

(b)

For the purpose of this section, “substantially completed” means that the amenities, furnishings, appliances, and structural components and mechanical systems of buildings on the real property dedicated to the time-share plan and subject to the project instruments are completed and provided as represented in the public offering statement, that the premises are ready for occupancy, and that the proper governmental authority has issued a certificate of occupancy or its equivalent.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-103; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1317; Acts 1989, No. 44, § 3; 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 44, § 4, provided that the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may promulgate such regulations as it deems necessary for the implementation of this act.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-409. Mutual rights of cancellation.

(a)(1)

Before transfer of a time-share interest and no later than the date of the sales contract, the developer shall provide the intended purchaser with a copy of the public offering statement and any amendments and supplements to the statement.

(2)

The contract is voidable by the purchaser until he or she has received the public offering statement.

(3)

The contract is voidable by the purchaser for five (5) days after execution of the contract of sale.

(4)

Cancellation is without penalty, and all payments made by the purchaser before cancellation shall be refunded within a reasonable time after receipt of the notice of cancellation under subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

Up to five (5) days after execution of the contract of sale, the developer may cancel the contract of purchase without penalty to either party and shall return all payments made within a reasonable time.

(c)

If either party elects to cancel a contract under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, he or she may do so by hand-delivering the notice to the other party or by mailing the notice by regular mail to the other party or to his or her agent for service of process, which notice is considered given when deposited in the mail.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-104; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1318; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated
(a) as (a)(1) through (4); in (a)(1), substituted “interest” for “interval” and “purchaser” for “transferee”; deleted “In addition” from the beginning of (a)(3); substituted “and shall return all payments made within a reasonable time” for “The developer shall return all payments made and the purchaser shall return all materials received in good condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted. If the materials are not returned, the developer may deduct the cost of them and return the balance to the purchaser” in (b); in (c), substituted “regular” for “prepaid United States”, substituted “is considered” for “shall be deemed”, and deleted “United States” preceding “mail” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

18-14-410. Liens.

(a)(1)

Before a transfer of a time-share interest, the developer shall record or furnish to the purchaser releases of all liens affecting that time-share interest or shall provide a surety bond or other insurance against the lien from a company acceptable to the Arkansas Real Estate Commission; or

(2)

An underlying lien shall contain a provision in which the lienholder subordinates its rights to that of a time-share purchaser who fully complies with the contract of sale.

(b)(1)

If a lien other than a mortgage or deed of trust becomes effective against more than one (1) time-share interest in a time-share property, a time-share interest owner may get a release of his or her time-share interest from the lien upon payment of the amount of the lien attributable to his or her time-share interest unless a time-share interest owner or his or her predecessor in title agrees otherwise with the lienor.

(2)

The payment shall be proportionate to the ratio that the time-share interest owner's liability bears to the liabilities of all time-share interest owners whose interests are subject to the lien.

(3)

Upon receipt of payment, the lienholder shall promptly deliver to the time-share interest owner a release of the lien covering that time-share interest.

(4)

After payment, the managing entity shall not assess or have a lien against that time-share interest for any part of the expenses incurred with that lien.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-107; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1321; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-411. Financial records — Examination.

(a)

The person or entity responsible for making or collecting common expense assessments or maintenance assessments shall keep detailed financial records.

(b)

All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available for examination by any time-share interest owner and his or her authorized agents.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 3, § 3-110; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1324; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “interest” for “interval” in (b).

Subchapter 5

— Advertising

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 765, § 8: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 294 of 1983 relating to the regulation of real estate time-share intervals by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission are in urgent need of revision to enable the Commission to effectively and efficiently administer the provisions of the Act; that this Act is designed to make the necessary revisions and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-501. Filing of advertising materials.

(a)

All advertising materials proposed for use or used in this state by a person with the offer or sale of a time-share property are subject to the review of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission upon its request.

(b)

Advertising materials include:

(1)

Promotional brochures, pamphlets, advertisements, or other materials to be distributed to the public concerning the sale of time-shares;

(2)

Transcripts of all radio and television advertisements;

(3)

Offers of travel, accommodations, meals, or entertainment at no cost or reduced cost;

(4)

Direct mail solicitation;

(5)

Advertising, including testimonials or endorsements;

(6)

Scripts or standardized narrative for use in making telephone solicitations; and

(7)

Websites or other electronic media.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 6, § 6-102; 1983, No. 765, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1335; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a); deleted former (b) and redesignated (c) as present (b); deleted “but are not limited to, the following” from the end of the introductory language of (b); substituted “distributed to the public concerning” for “disseminated to the public in connection with” in (b)(1);
and added (b)(7).

18-14-502. False advertising declared unlawful.

(a)

It is unlawful for a person with intent, directly or indirectly, to offer for sale or sell time-shares in this state or to authorize, use, direct, or aid in the publication, distribution, or circulation of an advertisement, radio broadcast, telecast, or other electronic media concerning the time-share plan in which the time-share properties are offered that contains a statement, pictorial representation, or sketch that is false or misleading.

(b)

This section does not hold the publisher or employee of a newspaper, a job printer, a broadcaster or telecaster, or a magazine publisher, or an employee thereof, liable for the publication referred to in this section unless the publisher, employee, or printer has actual knowledge of its falsity or has an interest as an owner or agent in the time-share plan advertised.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 6, § 6-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1334; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.